California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Encourage business and industry to reduce excess packaging of consumer products, to eliminate nonrecyclable contaminants from consumer goods, and to increase product durability. The board shall also promote waste handling practices which reduce waste generation by business and industry. 

(b) Encourage consumers to reduce waste generation through selective purchasing and to encourage recycling at home and work.

(c) Encourage local government procurement of products containing recycled materials, integration of recycling into the community waste management infrastructure, and public participation in local waste management decisionmaking. 

(d) Implement a “Buy Recycled” campaign to encourage business, industrial, and residential consumers to purchase products manufactured with, or packaged in, recycled materials. To promote the “Buy Recycled” program, the board shall develop a directory of California vendors providing recycled products and shall work to dispel myths regarding the inferiority of recycled products.

(e) Provide information to cities, counties, and regional agencies on programs implemented by the board pursuant to this section and strategies that may be pursued jointly by the board and cities, counties, and regional agencies to maximize coordination between state and local public information and education programs to reduce costs and improve efficiencies of state and local governments.

(f) Develop and disseminate to cities, counties, and regional agencies model public information materials and programs that can be used by those agencies in compliance with Sections 41220 and 41420.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42601.

The board shall measure public information program effectiveness through research which establishes program benchmarks and tracks results. The results of that measurement shall serve as the basis for program modification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 26.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

42602.

The board shall employ appropriate marketing techniques to disseminate its message, including radio and television advertising. The board may conduct paid advertising campaigns or solicit joint sponsorship of advertising campaigns by private industry for the purposes of complying with this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 717, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

42604.

On or before January 1, 1993, the State Board of Education shall include in the science framework appropriate language addressing the issue of integrated waste management in the ecology and environmental studies areas.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 717, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

42605.

The State Department of Education shall encourage participation in the integrated waste management education program established pursuant to this chapter in cooperation with the California Integrated Waste Management Board to satisfy the teaching requirements of the science framework adopted by the State Board of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 717, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.5. Schoolsite Source Reduction and Recycling [42620. - 42622.]

42620.

(a) The Legislature finds as follows: 

(1) There are 1,029 school districts and 7,170 schools in California. 

(2) Source reduction and recycling programs in the schools will significantly assist cities and counties in meeting the solid waste diversion goals set for 1995 and the year 2000, by Section 41780. 

(3) Source reduction and recycling programs in the schools will also educate children on the importance of these activities, and will teach them waste management skills that will last throughout their lives. 

(b) The Legislature, therefore, declares that school districts throughout the state should be assisted in establishing and implementing source reduction and recycling programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 843, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42621.

The board shall develop and implement a source reduction and recycling program for school districts which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(a) A survey of school districts throughout the state to determine which districts already have source reduction and recycling programs and which districts need those programs.

(b) Development of a model waste reduction and recycling program for school districts.

(c) Providing training for school districts on how to implement source reduction and recycling programs.

(d) Providing ongoing technical and informational assistance for school districts implementing source reduction and recycling programs.

(e) Establishment of a repository of literature and teaching materials from other states and institutions which have instituted source reduction and recycling programs for their waste stream.

(f) Determining the types of equipment needed by school districts to implement source reduction recycling programs.

(g) Providing assistance to school districts in locating markets for their reusable or recyclable materials.

(h) Disseminating information to school districts on office equipment and other items which are made from recycled materials and which are available for purchase by school districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 663, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42622.

The source reduction and recycling program for school districts developed pursuant to Section 42621 shall, to the extent feasible, be designed to complement and further the educational goals of the supplementary educational materials developed pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 71300) of Division 34, and the integrated waste management issues addressed within the science curriculum framework developed by the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 665, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.6. Schoolsite Source Reduction and Recycling Assistance Program [42630. - 42647.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings [42630. - 42630.]

42630.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, by enacting this chapter, to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Every school district and schoolsite in this state will be encouraged to implement source reduction, recycling, and composting programs that would do all of the following:

(A) Reduce waste and conserve resources.

(B) Provide pupils with a “hands-on” learning experience.

(C) Minimize the expenditure of taxpayer and education dollars on solid waste collection and disposal.

(2) School districts and individual schoolsites will cooperate with cities and counties in developing plans and programs to meet and exceed the state’s 50 percent waste reduction and recycling mandate.

(3) To the maximum extent feasible, school districts and schools will utilize products and supplies made from recycled materials.

(4) The State Department of Education, the State Board of Education, the California Environmental Protection Agency, and the Natural Resources Agency, will coordinate efforts in the development, dissemination, and promotion of the use of environmental education programs for pupils.

(b) The Legislature, therefore, declares that school districts throughout the state should be assisted in establishing and implementing source
 reduction and recycling programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 40.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [42635. - 42635.]

42635.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Environmentally preferable product” means a product that promotes healthy indoor environments for children, and demonstrates the use of the environmentally preferable materials and systems. When compared to other similar products with similar functions an environmentally preferable product has some, or all, of the following characteristics relative to those similar products serving similar functions:

(1) Less hazardous to public health, safety, and the environment.

(2) Consumes less energy in their manufacture or use.

(3) Contains more, or any amount of, recycled or post-consumer material content in their manufacture.

(4) Results in less potential waste.

(5) Results in less harm to indoor air quality.

(6) Consumes less water.

(7) Include features, or is manufactured from materials, that promotes recycling or reuse of the product.

(b) “Local agency” means a city that has prepared, adopted, and submitted to the county a source reduction and recycling element pursuant to Section 41000, and a county that has prepared and submitted to the board an integrated waste management plan pursuant to Section 41570.

(c) “Office” means a county office of education.

(d) “School” or “schoolsite” means a public elementary or secondary school.

(e) “School district” has the same meaning as defined in Section 80 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 926, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Diversion [42638. - 42638.]

42638.

Each school district and office may coordinate with local agencies to implement solid waste management programs to maximize the diversion of solid waste from landfill disposal or transformation facilities. This coordination between the school district or office and the local agency may include, but is not limited to, assessing the school district’s solid waste and diversion needs and developing new or expanding existing integrated waste management programs, including waste prevention, recycling and composting programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 926, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Models and School Waste Reduction Tools [42640. - 42640.]

42640.

(a) On or before July 1, 2002, after researching and determining the best waste reduction practices for school districts and schoolsites, the board shall develop models and school waste reduction tools, based upon the program developed pursuant to Section 42621, that may be used by schools, school districts, offices, and local agencies to implement waste reduction programs. The models and tools may include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Waste prevention, recycling, composting, procurement, and green building elements that, when properly implemented, create hands-on learning experiences for pupils and result in a greater reduction in schoolsite and school district solid waste generation than currently exists.

(2) Model waste reduction programs that may be implemented by the local agencies, schoolsites, and school districts.

(3) Environmental, economic, and educational benefits of implementing waste reduction programs.

(b) The board shall make the models and tools available and downloadable to local agencies, schools, and school districts from the board’s Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 926, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Training, Assistance, and Information [42641. - 42642.]

42641.

The board shall provide training and ongoing technical and informational assistance to local agencies, offices, schools, and school districts on implementing waste reduction programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 926, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

42642.

The Division of the State Architect, in consultation with the board, shall develop and maintain on its Web site, a list of environmentally preferable products and a list of recycled products that may be used in the construction and modernization of school facilities. The board shall provide notice to each school district of the existence of these lists and their location on these Web sites.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 926, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Grants [42645. - 42647.]

42645.

(a) The board, in consultation with the State Department of Education and the State Board of Education, shall establish a program to provide grants to school districts and schools to assist in the development and implementation of educational programs and to promote the use of existing educational programs to teach the concepts of source reduction, recycling, and composting.

(b) The board, in consultation with the State Department of Education and the State Board of Education, shall adopt criteria for awarding grants pursuant to this article, including, but not limited to, the grant’s structure, the schedule for awarding grants, and grant amount limits. These criteria shall include,
 but not be limited to, a procedure for the geographic distribution of the grants and the appropriate representation of elementary, middle, and high school as grant recipients. In adopting this criteria, the board shall include, in the criteria, the extent to which an office, a school district, or a school has demonstrated a commitment to achieving the following goals:

(1) The adoption of waste reduction and recycling programs and practices.

(2) The adoption and implementation of the unified education strategy adopted pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 71300) of Division 34.

(3) The allocation of adequate space for the safe collection, storage, and loading of recyclable materials.

(4) To the maximum extent feasible, the use of recycled materials
 and environmentally preferable products in the construction or modernization of public school facilities.

(5) Participation in the environmental ambassador pilot program established pursuant to Section 51226.4 of the Education Code.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the adoption of criteria for the awarding of grants pursuant to this article is not the adoption of a regulation, and is exempt from the requirements of that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 41.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42646.

On or before January 1, 2004, the board shall evaluate the implementation of school waste reduction and recycling programs in the state’s schools and if the board determines less than 75 percent of schools have implemented a waste reduction and recycling program, the board shall recommend to the Legislature those statutory changes needed to require schools to implement such a program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 926, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

42647.

The board may enter into an interagency agreement with the State Department of Education or other state agencies to implement this chapter, Part 4 (commencing with Section 71300) of Division 34, and Sections 33541 and 51226.4 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 665, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.7. Large Venue Recycling [42648. - 42648.7.]

42648.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Individual” means a person who works at, or attends, a large venue or large event, or a customer who is seated or served at the large venue or large event.

(b) “Large event” means an event that charges an admission price, or is operated by a local agency, and serves an average of more than 2,000 individuals per day of operation of the event, including, but not limited to, a public, nonprofit, or privately owned park, parking lot, golf course, street system, or other open space when being used for an event, including, but not limited to, a sporting event or a flea market.

(c) “Large venue” means a permanent venue facility that annually seats or serves an average of more than 2,000 individuals within the grounds of the facility per day of operation of the venue facility. For purposes of this chapter, a venue facility includes, but is not limited to, a public, nonprofit, or privately owned or operated stadium, amphitheater, arena, hall, amusement park, conference or civic center, zoo, aquarium, airport, racetrack, horse track, performing arts center, fairground, museum, theater, or other public attraction facility. For purposes of this chapter, a site under common ownership or control that includes more than one large venue that is contiguous with other large venues in the site, is a single large venue.

(d) “Local agency” means a city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.1.

On or before April 1, 2005, the board shall take all of the following actions:

(a) Make available one or more model ordinances that are suitable for modification by a local agency and that may be adopted by a local agency to facilitate solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling programs, at large venues and large events in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) While developing the model ordinance, consult with representatives of the League of California Cities, the California State Association of Counties, recyclers, private and public solid waste services and appropriate personnel involved with the operation and management of large venues and large events.

(c) Post information on the board’s Internet Web site on the solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling programs for implementation by operators of large venues and large events to decrease solid waste and increase diversion of recyclable materials.

(d) Post information on the board’s Internet Web site for local agencies, with examples of solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling programs, including, but not limited to, those operated by community conservation corps.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.2.

(a) (1) On and after July 1, 2005, when issuing a permit to an operator of a large venue or large event, the local agency shall provide information to the operator on programs that can be implemented to reduce, reuse, and recycle solid waste materials generated at the venue or event, and provide contact information about where solid waste materials may be donated, recycled, or composted. This information may include, but is not limited to, providing information directing the operator of the large venue or large event to the board’s Web site or any other appropriate Web site included by the local agency, direct mailings, brochures, or other relevant literature.

(2) On or before August 1, 2006, and annually thereafter until August 1, 2008, each local agency shall provide the board with an estimate and description of the top 10 percent of large venues and large events within its jurisdiction, based upon amount of solid waste generated, as submitted by operators of large venues and large events pursuant to Section 42648.3. To the extent that the information is readily available to the local agency, the information shall include the name, location, and a brief description of the venue or event, a brief description of the types of wastes generated, types, and estimated amount of materials disposed and diverted, by weight, and existing solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling programs that the operator of the large venue or large event utilizes to reduce, reuse, and recycle the solid waste. This information shall be reported to the board as a part of the local agency’s annual report submitted pursuant to Section 41821.

(b) On or before December 1, 2008, the board shall evaluate the solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling rates and implementation of waste reduction, reuse, and recycling plans in the top 10 percent of large venues and large events as reported by each local agency pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). If the board, upon reviewing the information reported to the board by local agencies pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), determines that less than 75 percent of the solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling plans for the large venues and large events have been prepared or implemented to meet their waste reduction, reuse, and recycling rates developed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42648.4, according to the schedule determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42468.4, the board shall recommend to the Legislature those statutory changes needed to require operators of large venues and large events to implement waste reduction, reuse, and recycling plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.3.

On or before July 1, 2005, and on or before July 1 annually thereafter, each operator of a large venue or large event shall submit to the local agency, upon request by the local agency, written documentation of waste reduction, reuse, recycling, and diversion programs, if any, implemented at the large venue or large event, and the type and weight of materials diverted and disposed at that large venue or large event. If the operator of a large venue or large event cannot implement a program as provided in the solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling plan, the operator shall include a brief explanation for the delay as part of its report to the local agency. The operator of the large venue or large event shall submit the requested information to the local agency, no later than one month from the date the operator receives the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.4.

On or before July 1, 2005, and on or before July 1, biennially thereafter, the operator of a large venue or large event shall meet with recyclers and with the solid waste enterprise that provides solid waste handling services to the large venue or large event, whether by an exclusive franchise with the local agency, or by a permit, contract, or nonexclusive franchise, to determine the solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling programs that are appropriate for the large venue or large event. In determining feasible solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling programs, the operator may do any of the following:

(a) Develop solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling rates and a solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling plan that would achieve those solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling rates.

(b) Determine a timeline for implementation of the solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling plan and solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.5.

The board shall provide technical assistance and tools to implement this chapter, to the extent feasible under existing financial resources. This technical assistance may include, but is not limited to, model documents, training, research on solid waste management best practices, cost reduction, and innovative products to assist local agencies and operators of large venues and large events to develop and implement effective solid waste reduction, reuse, and recycling plans and rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.6.

If a large venue or large event has contiguous parcels located in both the City of Los Angeles and the County of Los Angeles, the requirements of this chapter shall apply only to the local agency containing the majority of the property for that large venue or large event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.7.

A local agency may charge and collect a fee from an operator of a large venue or large event in order to recover the local agency’s estimated costs incurred in complying with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.8. Recycling of Commercial Solid Waste [42649. - 42649.7.]

42649.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to require businesses to recycle solid waste that they generate.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow jurisdictions flexibility in developing and maintaining commercial solid waste recycling programs.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce greenhouse gas emissions by diverting commercial solid waste to recycling efforts and to expand the opportunity for additional recycling services and recycling manufacturing facilities in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 12.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Business” means a commercial or public entity, including, but not limited to, a firm, partnership, proprietorship, joint stock company, corporation, or association that is organized as a for-profit or nonprofit entity, or a multifamily residential dwelling.

(b) “Commercial solid waste” includes all types of solid waste generated by a store, office, or other commercial or public entity source, including a business or a multifamily dwelling of five or more units.

(c) “Commercial waste generator” means a business subject to subdivision (a) of Section 42649.2.

(d) “Full-service restaurant” means an establishment with the primary business purpose of serving food, where food may be consumed on the premises, and an employee of the establishment takes all of the following actions:

(1) The consumer is escorted or assigned to an assigned eating area. The employee may choose the assigned eating area or may seat the consumer according to the consumer’s need for accommodation or other request.

(2) The consumer’s food and beverage orders are taken after the consumer has been seated at the assigned seating area.

(3) The food and beverage orders are delivered directly to the
 consumer, unless the establishment is buffet style or self-service.

(4) Any requested items associated with the consumer’s food or beverage order are brought to the consumer, unless the establishment is buffet style or self-service.

(5) The check is delivered directly to the consumer at the assigned eating area.

(e) “Park” means a theme park, amusement park, water park, resort or entertainment complex, zoo, attraction, or similar facility.

(f) “Self-hauler” means a business that hauls its own waste rather than
 contracting for that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.2.

(a) A business that generates four cubic yards or more of commercial solid waste per week or is a multifamily residential dwelling of five units or more shall arrange for recycling services, consistent with state or local laws or requirements, including a local ordinance or agreement, applicable to the collection, handling, or recycling of solid waste, to the extent that these services are offered and reasonably available from a local service provider.

(b) A commercial waste generator shall take at least one of the following actions:

(1) Source separate recyclable materials from solid waste and subscribe to a basic level of recycling service that includes collection, self-hauling, or other arrangements for the pickup of the recyclable materials.

(2) Subscribe to a recycling service that may include mixed waste processing that yields diversion results comparable to source separation.

(c) (1) A business subject to subdivision (a) and that provides customers access to the business shall provide customers with a commercial solid waste recycling bin or container to collect material purchased on the premises
 and that fulfills all of the following requirements:

(A) Is
 in the same area
 as a bin or container for trash other than recyclable commercial solid waste, except in restrooms.

(B) Is visible and easily accessible.

(C) Is clearly marked with educational signage indicating what is appropriate to place in the commercial solid waste recycling bin or container in accordance with state law and the local jurisdiction’s solid waste ordinances and practices.

(2) Full-service restaurants are exempt from the requirements of this subdivision if the full-service restaurant provides its employees a commercial solid waste recycling bin or
 container to collect material purchased on the premises and implements a program to collect recyclable commercial solid waste.

(3) With respect to a park that is subject to subdivision (a), this subdivision only applies to permanent, nonmobile food service facilities with dedicated seating areas that are not full-service restaurants. 

(4) The
 department shall develop model signage that businesses may use in implementing paragraph (1).

(5) For a park that is subject to subdivision (a), this subdivision shall apply on and after January 1, 2022.

(d) A property owner of a multifamily residential dwelling may require tenants to source separate their recyclable materials to aid in compliance with this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 56, Sec. 2.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.3.

(a) On and after July 1, 2012, each jurisdiction shall implement a commercial solid waste recycling program appropriate for that jurisdiction designed to divert commercial solid waste from businesses subject to Section 42649.2, whether or not the jurisdiction has met the requirements of Section 41780.

(b) If a jurisdiction already has a commercial solid waste recycling program as one of its diversion elements that meets the requirements of this section, it shall not be required to implement a new or expanded commercial solid waste recycling program.

(c) The commercial solid waste recycling program shall be directed at a
 commercial waste generator, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 42649.1, and may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Implementing a mandatory commercial solid waste recycling policy or ordinance.

(2) Requiring a mandatory commercial solid waste recycling program through a franchise contract or agreement.

(3) Requiring all commercial solid waste to go through either a source separated or mixed processing system that diverts material from disposal.

(d) The commercial solid waste recycling program shall include education, outreach to, and monitoring of, businesses. A jurisdiction shall notify a business if the business is not in compliance
 with Section 42649.2.

(e) The commercial solid waste recycling program may include enforcement provisions that are consistent with a jurisdiction’s authority, including a structure for fines and penalties.

(f) The commercial solid waste recycling program may include certification requirements for self-haulers.

(g) The department shall review a jurisdiction’s compliance with this section as part of the department’s review required by Section 41825. Each jurisdiction shall report the progress achieved in implementing its commercial recycling program, including
 education, outreach, identification, and monitoring, and if applicable, enforcement efforts, by providing updates in the annual report required by Section 41821.

(h) The department may also review whether a jurisdiction is in compliance with this section at any time that the department receives information that a jurisdiction has not implemented, or is not making a good faith effort to implement, a commercial recycling program.

(i) During its review pursuant to subdivision (g) or (h), the department shall determine whether each jurisdiction has made a good faith effort to implement its selected commercial recycling program. For purposes of this section, “good faith effort” means all reasonable and feasible efforts by a jurisdiction to implement its commercial
 recycling program. During its review, the department may include, but is not limited to, the following factors in its evaluation of a jurisdiction’s good faith effort:

(1) The extent to which businesses have complied with Section 42649.2, including information on the amount of disposal that is being diverted from the businesses, if available, and on the number of businesses that are subscribing to service.

(2) The recovery rate of the commercial waste from the material recovery facilities that are utilized by the businesses, all information, methods, and calculations, and any additional performance data, as requested by the department from the material recovery facilities pursuant to Section 18809.4 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The extent to which the jurisdiction is conducting education and outreach to businesses.

(4) The extent to which the jurisdiction is monitoring businesses, and notifying those businesses that are out of compliance.

(5) The availability of markets for collected recyclables.

(6) Budgetary constraints.

(7) In the case of a rural jurisdiction, the effects of small geographic size, low population density, or distance to markets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (AB 1398)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.4.

(a) If a jurisdiction adds or expands a commercial solid waste recycling program to meet the requirements of Section 42649.3, the jurisdiction shall not be required to revise its source reduction and recycling element, or obtain the department’s approval pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 41800) of Chapter 7 of Part 1.

(b) If an addition or expansion of a jurisdiction’s commercial solid waste recycling program is necessary, the jurisdiction shall update in its annual report required pursuant to Section 41821.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 12.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.5.

(a) This chapter does not limit the authority of a local agency to adopt, implement, or enforce a local commercial solid waste recycling requirement that is more stringent or comprehensive than the requirements of this section or limit the authority of a local agency in a county with a population of less than 200,000 to require commercial solid waste recycling.

(b) This chapter does not modify, limit, or abrogate in any manner any of the following:

(1) A franchise granted or extended by a city, county, or other local government agency.

(2) A contract, license, or permit to collect solid waste previously granted or extended by a city, county, or other local government agency.

(3) The existing right of a business to sell or donate its recyclable materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 12.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.6.

A local agency may charge and collect a fee from a commercial waste generator in order to recover the local agency’s costs incurred in complying with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 12.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.7.

If the State Air Resources Board adopts regulations for commercial recycling prior to the effective date of the act of the 2011–12 Regular Session of the Legislature adding this section, those regulations shall be deemed to have been adopted by the department, and they shall be added to the department’s regulations and deleted from the board’s regulations as if it were a change without regulatory effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 12.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.9. Recycling of Organic Waste [42649.8. - 42649.86.]

42649.8.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Business” means a commercial or public entity, including, but not limited to, a firm, partnership, proprietorship, joint stock company, corporation, or association that is organized as a for-profit or nonprofit entity, or a multifamily residential dwelling.

(b) “Commercial waste generator” means a business subject to subdivision (a) of Section 42649.2.

(c) “Full-service restaurant” means an establishment with the primary business purpose of serving food, where food may be consumed on the premises, and an employee of the establishment takes all of the following actions:

(1) The consumer is escorted or assigned to an assigned eating area. The employee may choose the assigned eating area or may seat the consumer according to the consumer’s need for accommodation or other request.

(2) The consumer’s food and beverage orders are taken after the consumer has been seated at the assigned seating area.

(3) The food and beverage orders are delivered directly to the consumer, unless the establishment is buffet style or self-service.

(4) Any requested items associated with the consumer’s food or beverage order are brought to the
 consumer, unless the establishment is buffet style or self-service.

(5) The check is delivered directly to the consumer at the assigned eating area.

(d) “Organic waste” means food waste, green waste, landscape and pruning waste, nonhazardous wood waste, and food-soiled paper waste that is mixed in with food waste.

(e) “Organic waste generator” means a business subject to subdivision (a) of Section 42649.81.

(f) “Park” means a theme park, amusement park, water park, resort or entertainment complex, zoo, attraction, or similar facility.

(g) “Rural jurisdiction” means a jurisdiction that is located entirely within one or more rural counties, or a
 regional agency comprised of jurisdictions that are located within one or more rural counties.

(h) “Rural county” means a county that has a total population of less than 70,000 persons.

(i) “Self-hauler” means a business that hauls its own waste rather than contracting for that service. “Self-haul” means to act as a self-hauler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 56, Sec. 3.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.81.

(a) (1) A business that generates four cubic yards or more of commercial solid waste, as defined in Section 42649.1, per week, shall arrange for recycling services specifically for organic waste in the manner specified in subdivision (b).

(2) On or after
 January 1, 2020, if the department determines that statewide disposal of organic waste has not been reduced to 50 percent of the level of disposal during 2014, a business that generates two cubic yards or more per week of commercial solid waste shall arrange for the organic waste recycling services specified in paragraph (1), unless the department determines that this requirement will not result in significant additional reductions of organics disposal.

(3) A business located
 in a rural jurisdiction that is exempted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42649.82 is not subject to this chapter.

(b) A business subject to subdivision (a) shall take at least one of the following actions:

(1) Source separate organic waste from other waste and subscribe to a basic level of organic waste recycling service that includes collection and recycling of organic waste.

(2) Recycle its organic waste onsite or self-haul its own organic waste for recycling.
